Massachusetts, session 194th, H2053.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3A of chapter 119A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 10 and 11, the words “in accordance
with rule 4(d)(2) of the Massachusetts Rules of Domestic Relations Procedure” and inserting in
place thereof the following words:- by summons personally.
SECTION 2. Paragraph (3) of section 10 of said chapter 119A, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding the following sentence:- Annually, not later than October 15, said report
shall be published on the Mass.gov website or any successor website.
SECTION 3. Section 12 of said chapter 119A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding the following subsection:-
(n) If a noncustodial parent is incarcerated for a period exceeding 90 consecutive days,
their child support obligation shall be automatically modified to reflect an income based on the
state minimum wage, unless the custodial parent or the child support enforcement division
of 3

presents evidence to the probate and family court that the noncustodial parent has alternative
income or assets available to meet their support obligation.
SECTION 4. Subsection (b) of section 16 of said chapter 119A, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by inserting after the first sentence the following sentence:- The division of
child support enforcement shall not notify the licensing authority, for the purpose of suspending,
revoking, prohibiting issuance or renewal of a driver's license, for any support obligor who is
determined to be out of compliance with a judgment or order for support in a case enforced
under Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act, if the annual household income of the
support obligor is at or below 70 per cent of the median income for the county in which the
department or the local child support enforcement agency determines the support obligor resides,
based on the most recent available data published by the United States Department of Housing
and Urban Development or any successor agency.
SECTION 5. The second sentence of said section (b) of said section 16 of said chapter
119A, inserted by section 4, is hereby amended by striking out the words “driver’s license” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:- noncommercial driver’s license.
SECTION 6. Section 8 of chapter 209C of the General Laws, as most recently amended
by section 37 of chapter 166 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by striking out the
words “in accordance with the applicable rules of court” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- by summons personally.
SECTION 7. Subsection (a) of section 9 of said chapter 209C, as most recently amended
by section 39 of said chapter 166, is hereby further amended by striking out the words “In
of 3

accordance with the applicable rules of court” and inserting in place thereof the following
words:- by summons personally.
SECTION 8. The executive office of the trial court shall promulgate amendments to the
child support guidelines to reflect the following:
(i) if the noncustodial parent earned a yearly income within the last 5 years of $100,000
or more, and is currently making below that amount, a child support order may be established
attributed to that previous income. Otherwise, income may not be attributed to potential earning
capacity; and
(ii) if the obligor is unemployed at the time of the attribution, or employed but earning an
amount less than the income attributed to them, the obligor shall be granted a grace period of 60
days from the date of the income attribution determination to obtain employment or increase
their earnings to reflect the attributed income. During said grace period, no enforcement action,
including but not limited to license suspension, wage garnishment, bank levies or contempt
proceedings, shall be initiated solely based on the attributed income, and the obligor shall
provide reasonable documentation of job search efforts or employment status to the court or the
division of child support enforcement of the department of revenue.
SECTION 9. Section 4 shall take effect January 1, 2027.
SECTION 10. Section 5 shall take effect January 1, 2028.
of 3